Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 38 National Guard

38.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Kentucky National Guard” includes the Army National Guard and Air National Guard;

“Active Army National Guard and active Air National Guard” includes those organizations, officers, and enlisted personnel, both male and female, of the federally recognized Kentucky National Guard authorized to receive federal pay, arms, and equipment;

“Inactive Army National Guard and inactive Air National Guard” includes those organizations, officers, and enlisted personnel, both male and female, of the Kentucky National Guard not entitled to receive federal pay, arms, and equipment;

“State active duty” is:

The ordering by the Governor of personnel or units of the Kentucky National Guard to perform any duty authorized by KRS 38.030(1)(a);

Officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel employed under orders of the Governor in making tours of inspection, mustering in or mustering out troops, making surveys of military property, sitting on courts-martial, summary courts, efficiency boards, courts of inquiry or boards of officers, or performance of any other duty directed by the Governor or adjutant general;

The participation of any unit or units of the Kentucky National Guard in gunnery competition or other training or military exercise anywhere within or without the United States.

Words importing the masculine gender only shall extend to and be applied to females as well as males.

History.

2711a-234: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 1; 1958, ch. 89, § 1; 1970, ch. 265, § 1; 1976, ch. 161, § 1; 1992, ch. 307, § 3, effective April 9, 1992.

38.020.
National Guard, how composed — Acceptance or rejection of unit allotments by Department of Defense.

The Kentucky National Guard shall consist of the officers, warrant officers, enlisted men and units as prescribed in tables of organization of the Department of the Army for the Army National Guard, and the officers, warrant officers, enlisted men and units as prescribed in the tables of organization of the Department of the Air Force, Air National Guard and the inactive Army and inactive Air National Guard.

The Governor may accept or reject any or all organizations allotted to Kentucky by the United States Department of Defense. He may recommend to the United States Department of Defense the type of organizations both Army and Air Force, which he considers to be best suited to the performance of Kentucky’s internal defense and security missions.

History.

2711a-160, 2711a-161: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 2.

38.030.
Ordering troops into state active duty — Nontactical direction by local civil officers — Disability compensation for injury or disease arising from state active duty.

Only the Governor shall have the authority to order units and members of the Kentucky National Guard into state active duty.

The Governor may order units and individual members of the Kentucky National Guard into state active duty for any of the following purposes:

Protecting lives and property;

Assisting in disaster relief or other humanitarian efforts;

Preventing or suppressing riot or civil disorder;

Enforcing the laws of the Commonwealth; or

Other similar purpose.

In addition to ordering personnel and units to state active duty, the Governor may order other members of the Kentucky National Guard to participate in or perform duty in support of state active duty missions notwithstanding the fact that they are then entitled to receive federal pay and allowances pursuant to Title 32 of the United States Code. The personnel may be ordered to perform state active duty support missions either prior to, during, or after the time that state active duty missions are planned or performed.

Members of the National Guard who are ordered to perform duty as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section while they are entitled to receive federal pay under Title 32 of the United States Code shall have all of the powers, immunities, and benefits conferred by law upon persons ordered to state active duty except that they shall receive no additional pay for the duty and the provisions of KRS

38.235

shall not apply to them. The powers, immunities, and benefits conferred upon those persons shall be in addition to, and not in place of, those powers, immunities, and benefits provided under federal law.

Any member of the National Guard may, with his consent, be ordered to state active duty without pay.

The Governor may direct the commanding officer of the military forces ordered to state active duty to report to any civil officer, including, but not limited to, judge, county judge/executive, mayor, sheriff, or head of law enforcement or other public agency in whose jurisdiction the state active duty mission is to be performed. The civil officer may advise the commanding officer regarding the specific objectives to be accomplished by the military force, but the tactical direction and disposition of the troops and the particular means to be employed to accomplish the mission shall be left solely to the commanding officer of the National Guard.

Troops shall not be relieved from active field service except by order of the Governor.

National Guard officers, enlisted soldiers, and airmen who are temporarily or permanently disabled as a direct result of an injury or disease arising out of the performance of an act in the line of duty while on state active duty shall, at the discretion of the Governor, remain on paid state active duty status until a competent medical authority releases them to return to their normal activities or the Governor deems it appropriate to relieve the individual from state active duty status. Compensation paid to the soldier or airman by the department shall be adjusted and maintained at the soldier’s or airman’s regular rate of active duty pay; however, compensation paid by the department shall be reduced by the amount of payments received from workers’ compensation insurance, Social Security benefits, and other federal or state-financed disability programs designed to supplement the soldier’s or airman’s income. Final compensation shall not be reduced by payments for medical care.

History.

2711a-149, 2711a-163, 2711a-195; Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 3; 1962, ch. 47, § 1; 1974, ch. 108, § 13; 1976, ch. 62, § 49; 1992, ch. 307, § 4, effective April 9, 1992; 2009, ch. 95, § 1, effective March 24, 2009; 2010, ch. 13, § 1, effective March 11, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2014, ch. 71, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.

38.040.
Appointment of officers and warrant officers — Staff officers — Conformity with federal standards.

All commissioned officers and warrant officers of the Kentucky National Guard shall be appointed by the Governor, upon the recommendation of the adjutant general and the commanding officers of the organizations to which such officers are to be assigned for duty, and shall be appointed according to grade in the branch or corps of the service in which they are appointed. No officer or warrant officer shall be appointed unless he is eighteen (18) years of age or older and until he shall have successfully passed such tests as to his physical, moral and professional fitness as are or shall be prescribed by federal law for federal recognition as an officer.

All appointments as staff officers shall be of individuals with previous military experience.

The Governor may issue such regulations governing the appointment of commissioned officers and warrant officers in the Kentucky National Guard as may be necessary in order to conform to the requirements made by Congress for participation in federal appropriations for the Kentucky National Guard.

No officer or warrant officer except the adjutant general shall retain the grade to which he may have been appointed or promoted unless, within a reasonable length of time, he obtains federal recognition for such grade.

History.

2711a-164: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 4; 1962, ch. 47, § 2; 1974, ch. 108, § 14.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Officers to have commission, KRS

61.020

.

ALR

Incompatibility of offices of public officer and officer of National Guard or militia. 26 A.L.R. 142; 132 A.L.R. 254; 147 A.L.R. 1419; 148 A.L.R. 1399; 150 A.L.R. 1444.

38.050.
Qualifications of commissioned officers. [Repealed.]

38.060.
Examination and nomination of commissioned officers. [Repealed.]

38.070.
Oath of commissioned officers.

Every officer shall take and subscribe to an oath of office as prescribed by the Department of Defense. The oath shall be taken and subscribed before any officer from any branch of the armed services authorized to administer oaths. In case of neglect or refusal to take and subscribe to the oath the commission shall be canceled by the Governor and a new appointment shall be made to fill the vacancy.

History.

2711a-168: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 47, § 3; 1984, ch. 414, § 45, effective July 13, 1984.

38.080.
Warrant officers — Appointment — Reducing to ranks. [Repealed.]

38.090.
Enlistment in Kentucky National Guard — Oath — Transfer — Extension of enlistments.

All able-bodied citizens of the United States, of good character, who can read and write the English language, who are between the ages of seventeen (17) and thirty-five (35) years with no prior service; between thirty-six (36) and under thirty-eight (38) with one (1) year of service; thirty-eight (38) and under forty-one (41) with two (2) years of service and forty-one (41) and under fifty-seven (57) with two (2) years plus the number of years applicant is over age forty (40), and who have passed the required physical examination and who are not ineligible for enlistment or reenlistment in the Armed Forces of the United States, subject to current United States Armed Forces regulations covering enlistments and reenlistments, may be enlisted or reenlisted in the Kentucky National Guard for a term of one (1) or more years.

No person dishonorably discharged or discharged without honor from the Armed Forces of the United States shall be eligible for enlistment in the Kentucky National Guard.

Every person who enlists, extends his enlistment or reenlists shall sign and make oath to an enlistment paper before any officer from any branch of the armed services authorized to administer oaths.

Enlisted persons may be transferred to or from organizations, as provided by regulations.

By order of the Governor in case of emergency, enlistments in the Kentucky National Guard may be extended for one (1) year.

History.

2711a-174 to 2711a-176: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 5; 1962, ch. 47, § 4; 1974, ch. 108, § 15; 1984, ch. 414, § 46, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Minor’s right to wages or similar payments for enlistment or military services. 137 A.L.R. 1491; 147 A.L.R. 1311; 151 A.L.R. 1455; 153 A.L.R. 1420; 155 A.L.R. 1451; 157 A.L.R. 1449.

38.100.
Inactive National Guard.

The inactive National Guard shall consist of the officers and men of the Kentucky National Guard not on the active list. In time of peace, officers and enlisted men of the Kentucky National Guard may be transferred at their own request to the inactive National Guard. Upon the authorized disbandment or consolidation of organizations of the National Guard, all commissioned officers and enlisted men rendered surplus who are qualified for active service and have not been transferred to active units may be transferred to the inactive National Guard. Officers and enlisted men of the inactive National Guard may become members of the active National Guard in time of peace where circumstances permit.

History.

2711a-169: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 6.

38.110.
Duration of commission.

An officer of the Kentucky National Guard shall hold his commission so long as he is entitled to federal recognition in that grade unless separated from the service prior to that time by reason of resignation, disability or for cause to be determined by a court-martial or efficiency board legally convened for that purpose.

History.

2711a-165, 2711a-171: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 7; 1962, ch. 47, § 5.

38.120.
Resignation of officers.

A commissioned officer tendering his resignation, if the Governor accepts it, shall receive an honorable discharge if he is not under arrest or to be returned to a military court for deficiency or delinquency. The Governor may not accept the resignation of an officer of the Kentucky National Guard who has been charged with an offense under the Kentucky Military Code of Justice which is tantamount to a felony under Kentucky criminal law.

History.

2711a-170: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 8.

38.130.
Discharge of officer for unfitness for service.

The Governor may order any commissioned officer before an efficiency board consisting of three (3) officers senior in rank to the officer whose fitness for service is under examination. The board shall have the powers of courts of inquiry and courts-martial to subpoena witnesses and produce testimony and shall inquire into the moral character, capacity and general fitness of the commissioned officer. The board shall make a record of all proceedings. If the findings of the board are unfavorable to the officer and are approved by the Governor, he shall be discharged from the service. No officer shall participate in the examination or decision of the board in any case in which the decision would affect his own grade or promotion. Failure to appear when ordered before a board constituted under this section shall be sufficient grounds for a finding of the board that the officer ordered to appear be discharged.

History.

2711a-172: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 9; 1962, ch. 47, § 6.

38.140.
Enlisted man, discharge of — Discharge papers.

An enlisted man shall not be discharged before the expiration of his term of service except by order of the Governor or by sentence of court-martial approved by the Governor. A soldier upon his discharge from service, shall be given a certificate of discharge or report of separation from service.

The types of discharges used shall be the same as those authorized by the National Guard Bureau.

History.

2711a-180: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 10; 1962, ch. 47, § 7.

38.150.
Enlisted man, discharge of without honor. [Repealed.]

38.160.
Dishonorable discharge — Governor to approve dismissal.

A dishonorable discharge shall be given only by sentence of a general court-martial. No sentence of dismissal from the service or dishonorable discharge imposed by a court-martial shall be executed until approved by the Governor.

History.

2711a-182, 2711a-221.

38.170.
Certificate issued upon loss of discharge certificate.

Upon satisfactory proof of the loss of a discharge certificate or of its destruction the adjutant general may cause to be issued to the person a certificate of service, showing the date of enlistment and discharge from the military service and character given on the original discharge certificate upon payment of a one dollar ($1) fee.

History.

2711a-183: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 11.

38.180.
Member absent without leave.

The commission of any officer who absents himself without leave for three (3) months shall be vacated, and he may be dropped from the rolls of the National Guard and dismissed from service and be subject to punishment under the Kentucky Code of Military Justice.

When an enlisted man of the National Guard absents himself without leave and there is reason to believe that he does not intend to return, he may be dropped from the rolls.

History.

2711a-173, 2711a-178: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 12.

38.190.
Governor may restore enlisted man to service. [Repealed.]

38.200.
Daily pay for active state service. [Repealed.]

38.205.
Compensation for state active duty.

Except when in the service of the United States, officers and enlisted men, when employed in state active duty, beginning with the day they assemble at their armories or other designated places until the day they return there and have been properly relieved, including, fractional parts of a day which count as a full day, shall receive pay at the same rate as though serving on active duty as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, but the rate shall not be less than twelve (12) times the prevailing federal minimum hourly wage per day.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 140, § 1; 1974, ch. 111, § 1; 1980, ch. 128, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 307, § 5, effective April 9, 1992.

38.210.
Pay at encampments or other exercises. [Repealed.]

38.220.
Pay for services and attendance at courts and boards. [Repealed.]

38.230.
Military tribunals may subpoena witnesses — Fees. [Repealed.]

38.235.
Acceptance of workers’ compensation law — Direct payment of benefits.

The Department of Military Affairs shall accept the provisions of KRS Chapter 342 for the benefit of members of the Kentucky National Guard while members are on state active duty.

The department may, in lieu of procuring additional extended insurance coverage, elect to avail itself of the provisions of KRS

342.340

, relating to the direct payment of benefits, for the purpose of paying the benefits provided under subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 182; 1966, ch. 88, §§ 1, 2; 1970, ch. 92, § 13; 1976, ch. 161, § 2; 1992, ch. 307, § 6, effective April 9, 1992.

38.238.
Employer required to grant employee leave to serve in National Guard.

An employee shall be granted a leave of absence by his or her employer for the period required to perform active duty or training in the National Guard of this or any other state. Upon the employee’s release from a period of active duty or training, the employee shall be permitted to return to his or her former position of employment with the seniority, status, pay or any other rights or benefits he or she would have had if he or she had not been absent, except that no employer shall be required to grant an employee a leave of absence with pay.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 249, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2018 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Legal Issues for Today’s Citizen Soldier: USERRA Protections for Reemployment Rights of Returning Military Personnel, Vol. 69, No. 6, Nov. 2005, Ky. Bench & Bar 16.

38.240.
Legal representation of members of National Guard.

If any member of the National Guard, when on duty or assembled therefor under lawful authority, does any act in the discharge of his duty that causes him to be proceeded against by civil court action, the Attorney General shall represent him in the civil proceedings. If, under the same conditions, a member of the National Guard is proceeded against in a criminal action, the adjutant general may, with the approval of the Governor, appoint legal counsel to represent him in the criminal proceedings. The compensation paid the legal counsel shall be fixed by the adjutant general, with the written approval of the Governor.

History.

2711a-190: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 15; 1962, ch. 47, § 11; 1966, ch. 88, § 3.

38.250.
Amount of training each year.

Every unit of the Kentucky National Guard shall assemble for drill and instructions not less than forty-eight (48) times each year, and shall participate in encampments, maneuvers or other exercises at least fifteen (15) days in each year unless excused therefrom by the Governor. The number present in order to obtain credit for the drill, period of time and type of instruction shall be such as is prescribed by the Governor.

History.

2711a-194: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 16; 1962, ch. 47, § 12; 2006, ch. 194, § 3, effective July 12, 2006.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The 15 days annual military leave applies only to periodic and temporary military duty.

OAG 68-267

.

KRS

61.394

is the latest pronouncement of the legislature and its provisions limiting and delineating computation of leave should prevail where they conflict with subsection (2) of this section in paying all officers and employes of the state who are members of the National Guard or any reserve component of the armed forces of the United States while they are on active duty with the military.

OAG 73-48

; 76-358.

38.260.
Tactics and field exercises same as army’s. [Repealed.]

38.270.
Maintenance and equipment.

Units allotted to the Kentucky National Guard by the United States Department of Defense and accepted by the Governor shall be maintained by the state and furnished with adequate and suitable armory accommodations, ranges, and camp grounds.

The state shall provide such arms, equipment, colors, camp and garrison equipage, books of instruction and of record and other supplies as are necessary for the proper performance of the duties required by this chapter.

Every commissioned officer or warrant officer shall provide himself, at his own expense, with uniforms and equipment required to be worn by officers of his rank. The department may provide a $150 uniform allowance for each newly commissioned officer or warrant officer.

History.

2711a-161, 2711a-196, 2711a-197: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 17; 1974, ch. 109, § 1.

38.280.
Liability for lost or damaged property.

Every officer and enlisted man shall be personally responsible to the state for loss or damage to public property issued to him, and no one shall be relieved from liability, unless it is shown to the satisfaction of the Governor that the loss of or damage to the property was unavoidable and in no way the fault of the person responsible for the property. The value of the property lost or damaged, in the amount determined by a surveying officer or a board, shall be charged against the person at fault or, with the concurrence of its commanding officer, to the command to or for which it has been issued, and, if not relieved from the charge by the Governor, it shall be an indebtedness from the person or command to the state. The value of property lost or damaged for which an enlisted man is liable shall be charged against his pay by his commanding officer, and collected on such forms and under such regulations as may be prescribed.

History.

2711a-191, 2711a-198.

38.290.
Officer in control of occupied premises — Equipment to be stored in armory.

Premises occupied by the Kentucky National Guard for military purposes shall be under the control of the senior National Guard officer using them.

All military property furnished for the use of the several organizations of the Kentucky National Guard shall be kept in the armory or storerooms of the command, except when in use for authorized military purposes.

History.

2711a-203, 2711a-204: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 18; 1962, ch. 47, § 13.

38.300.
Use and possession of military property.

Military property shall be used for authorized military purposes only. No officer or soldier shall wear, use or have in his possession, except for authorized military purposes, or by special permission of his commanding officer, any uniform or part thereof, or any other article of military property belonging to the state or the United States.

History.

2711a-204, 2711a-205.

38.310.
Property furnished by United States not to be disposed of.

No military property furnished by the United States, through the agency of the state, to any officer or soldier of the Kentucky National Guard shall be sold, bartered, exchanged, pledged, loaned or given away. No person, not a soldier or duly authorized officer of the state, who has possession of any military property so furnished, and which has been the subject of any such barter, exchange, pledge, loan or gift, shall have any right, title or interest therein, but the property may be seized and taken wherever found by any officer of the state, civil or military, and shall thereupon be delivered to the adjutant general or other officer authorized to receive it. The possession of such military property by any person not a soldier or officer of the state shall be presumptive evidence of such a sale, barter, exchange, pledge, loan or gift.

History.

2711a-207: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 19.

38.320.
Military courts; procedure. [Repealed.]

38.330.
Courts of inquiry. [Repealed.]

38.340.
General courts-martial. [Repealed.]

38.350.
Special courts-martial. [Repealed.]

38.360.
Summary courts. [Repealed.]

38.370.
Confinement in lieu of fines. [Repealed.]

38.380.
Right of accused to counsel. [Repealed.]

38.390.
Arrest of accused; evidence. [Repealed.]

38.400.
Civil officers to execute process and sentences.

All processes and sentences of military courts shall be executed by sheriffs or other civil officers and such officers shall make return thereof to the officer issuing the process or imposing the sentence.

History.

2711a-223.

38.410.
Jail or prison may be used for military prisoners — Cost of imprisonment. [Repealed.]

38.420.
Authorization for military personnel to carry arms when on state active duty.

Officers, warrant officers, and enlisted men of the Kentucky National Guard shall, while on state active duty, have the same right to carry arms and in the same manner as sheriffs and other peace officers.

History.

2711a-233: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 20; 1992, ch. 307, § 7, effective April 9, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Concealed weapons, who may carry, KRS

527.020

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note, Carrying a Concealed Weapon — Nature of the Offense in Kentucky, 38 Ky. L.J. 275 (1949-1950).

38.430.
Exemption from tolls.

Officers, warrant officers, and enlisted men of the Kentucky National Guard, going to or returning from any parade, encampment, drill or meeting they are required by proper authority to attend, shall, together with their vehicular conveyances, animals and military property in their custody, be allowed to pass free through tollgates and over all interstate and intrastate toll bridges and ferries if they are in uniform or present a written order signed by an officer of the Kentucky National Guard.

History.

2711a-209: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 21; 1974, ch. 108, § 16.

38.440.
Entities who may drill or parade with arms without Governor’s permission.

Except as permitted in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, no persons other than the Kentucky National Guard or Kentucky active militia shall associate together as an armed company or drill or parade with arms without permission from the Governor.

Students in educational institutions chartered under the laws of Kentucky, in which military science is part of the course of instruction, may drill and parade with arms in public under the supervision of their instructors.

Veterans’ service organizations may wear swords and may drill or parade with arms in public.

People participating in the reenactment of a historical military event from the French and Indian War, Revolutionary War, War of 1812, United States Civil War, or Spanish-American War may wear swords and may drill or parade with arms in public.

History.

2711a-211: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 22; 2011, ch. 26, § 1, effective March 15, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

2012-2014 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 144, Pt. III, 25 at 1241.

38.450.
Persons not to wear insignia of National Guard.

No person shall wear any uniform, device, strap, knot or other insignia prescribed by law or general regulations as a designation of rank, grade or office in the Kentucky National Guard, except members of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps or Coast Guard of the United States, the National Guard of this or any other state, members of associations wholly composed of soldiers honorably discharged from the service of the United States or any state, and the faculty and students of educational institutions.

History.

2711a-199: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 23.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Wearing insignia or uniform of active militia, KRS

37.990

.

38.460.
Injuring business of or discriminating against member of the National Guard.

No person shall, either as an individual or with another, willfully deprive a member of the National Guard or Kentucky active militia of employment, or prevent the member being employed, or in any way obstruct a member of the National Guard or Kentucky active militia in the conduct of trade, business, or profession, or by threats of violence prevent any person from enlisting in the National Guard or Kentucky active militia. References to the National Guard in this statute include members of the National Guard of this or any other state.

No association or corporation constituted or organized for the purpose of promoting the success of the trade, employment, or business of the members thereof shall by any constitution, rule, bylaw, resolution, vote, or regulation discriminate against any member of the National Guard or Kentucky active militia because of membership, eligibility for membership, or right to retain membership in such organization.

HISTORY:

2711a-212, 2711a-213: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 24; 2018 ch. 82, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

38.470.
Student’s credit when called into active service.

If the Kentucky National Guard or Kentucky active militia is called into state active duty by the Governor or into federal active duty by the President of the United States for any purpose, requiring the service of members who are students in any institution of learning in the state, no teacher, professor, principal, or president of the institution shall discriminate against the student by reason of his absence, but shall credit him with all academic work accomplished to the date of his absence. Students shall be given reasonable time to make up work missed as a result of a call to state or federal active duty.

History.

2711a-238: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 25; 1974, ch. 108, § 17; 1992, ch. 307, § 8, effective April 9, 1992; 2006, ch. 19, § § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

38.480.
Immunity for acts done in pursuance of duty — Immunity from arrest on civil process.

Officers, warrant officers, and enlisted men of the Kentucky National Guard or Kentucky active militia ordered into state active duty by the Governor, and when specifically directed by the Governor, shall be deemed peace officers as defined in KRS

61.310

and

446.010

. They shall have all the powers and immunities of peace officers, and shall not be liable, civilly or criminally, for any act done by them in pursuance of duty in state active duty.

No officer, warrant officer, or enlisted man of the Kentucky National Guard or Kentucky active militia shall be arrested, except in case of a felony, while going to, remaining at, or returning from a place where he is ordered to attend for state active duty.

History.

2711a-208, 2711a-240: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 26; 1968, ch. 130; 1992, ch. 307, § 9, effective April 9, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Service of civil process, exemption of member of armed forces from. 137 A.L.R. 1372; 147 A.L.R. 1307; 148 A.L.R. 1385; 149 A.L.R. 1454; 150 A.L.R. 1419; 151 A.L.R. 1454; 153 A.L.R. 1419; 155 A.L.R. 1450; 156 A.L.R. 1449.

38.490.
Liability insurance for Kentucky National Guard members on active state duty.

The Adjutant General may purchase liability insurance for the protection of members of the Kentucky National Guard called to state active duty by the Governor under KRS

38.030

to protect them for acts, omissions, and claims arising while on state active duty, and while not otherwise covered by existing state government programs that provide medical coverage or protection for acts, omissions, or claims to members of the Kentucky National Guard while on state active duty. To provide coverage not provided by existing state government programs, the Adjutant General may purchase the type and amount of liability coverage deemed appropriate to best serve the interests of the Kentucky National Guard and its members.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 516, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

38.495.
Duties of adjutant general relating to life insurance for National Guard members.

As used in this section:

“Member” means a member of the Kentucky National Guard; and

“Program” means the state-sponsored group term life insurance program exclusively offered to all members of the Kentucky National Guard through the National Guard Association of Kentucky, as provided in 37

U.S.C. sec. 707

.

The adjutant general shall:

Facilitate and coordinate all efforts to make the program available to all members, including the period of time during initial enlistment or commissioning;

Provide an opportunity for members to enroll in or modify life insurance under the program, which shall include allowing members to designate or change beneficiaries;

Facilitate and coordinate requested allotments for the payment of premiums:

Using the United States Defense Finance and Accounting Service military pay allotment with the appropriate United States Property and Fiscal Office; and

For life insurance under the program; and

Allow program representatives to provide Kentucky National Guard units with program briefings during annual training, drill weekends, and other opportunities to educate members on program benefits.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 18, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

38.500.
Educational encouragement fund. [Repealed.]

38.510.
Rights, benefits, and protections upon call to active duty.

Any right, benefit, or protection that may accrue to a member of the Kentucky National Guard under the Federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50

U.S.C. secs. 501

et seq., as a result of a call to federal active duty service under Title 10 of the United States Code shall be extended to a member of the Kentucky National Guard called to active duty service under Title 32 of the United States Code, or to state active duty by the Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, if the active duty orders are for a period of thirty (30) days or more.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 321, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 53, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

38.990.
Penalties.

Any person who makes a false oath as to any statement contained in the enlistment papers mentioned in subsection (3) of KRS

38.090

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any civil officer who fails to execute process and sentences when required to do so under KRS

38.400

shall be fined not more than fifty dollars ($50) for each offense.

Any master, keeper, or other person in charge of a tollgate, toll bridge, or ferry who willfully hinders or delays any member of the Kentucky National Guard or Kentucky active militia going to or returning from any parade, encampment, drill, or meeting which he is required by proper authority to attend, or who refuses free passage to any member, conveyance, or other property in violation of KRS

38.430

shall be fined not more than fifty dollars ($50) for each offense.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

38.440

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

38.450

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (1) of KRS

38.460

or who aids in enforcing any provision prohibited by subsection (2) of KRS

38.460

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned in the county jail not less than six (6) months, or both.

Any person who trespasses upon property occupied by the Kentucky National Guard or Kentucky active militia contrary to the orders of the officer in charge of such property shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned in the county jail for six (6) months, or both.

Any witness who refuses to appear in answer to a subpoena, to answer questions before a military court or board is guilty of contempt and may be fined not more than fifty dollars ($50) by such court or board.

Any employer failing to meet any requirements of KRS

38.238

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

2711a-175, 2711a-199, 2711a-203, 2711a-210, 2711a-213, 2711a-222 (in part), 2711a-223: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 98, § 27; 1962, ch. 47, § 14; 1980, ch. 249, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.